Utah statutes.
19-6-429.   False information and claims.
(1)  Any person who presents or causes to be presented any oral or written
statement, knowing the statement contains false information, in order to
obtain a certificate of compliance is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(2) (a)  Any person who presents or causes to be presented any claim for
payment from the fund, knowing the claim contains materially false information
or knowing the claim is not eligible for payment from the fund, is subject to
the criminal penalties under Section 76-10-1801 regarding fraud.
(b)  The level of criminal penalty shall be determined by the value involved,
in the same manner as in Section 76-10-1801.
